Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 8
ASSESSOR

30-10-801. Assessor - election - bond - insurance - term - oath or affirmation.

A county assessor shall be elected in each county at a general election and, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, shall: Give bond to the people of the state of Colorado with two or more sufficient sureties, in a sum of not less than six thousand dollars for the performance of the assessor's duties according to law and to the satisfaction of the board of county commissioners; take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101; be a qualified elector of the county; and hold office for four years and until a successor is elected and qualified.

In lieu of the bond required by subsection (1) of this section, a county may purchase crime insurance coverage in an amount not less than ten thousand dollars on behalf of the assessor to protect the people of the county from any malfeasance on the part of the assessor while in office.

Source:

G.L.

§ 548.

L. 1881:

p. 99, § 1.

G.S.

§ 647.

R.S. 08:

§ 1342.

C.L.

§ 8817.

CSA:

C. 45, § 164.

CRS 53:

§ 35-8-1.

L. 56:

p. 130, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-8-1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 564, § 28, effective August 11.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 697, § 26, effective August 8.

Cross references:

(1) For the oath of civil officers, see § 8 of art. XII, Colo. Const.; for county officers' election and term in office, see § 8 of art. XIV, Colo. Const.; for the election of county assessors, see § 1-4-206.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

30-10-802. Assessment district - deputy in each - oath or affirmation - bond.

When the board of county commissioners of any county is of the opinion that the assessor is unable to perform the duties of office within the time prescribed by law, the board shall divide the county into assessment districts and shall require the assessor to appoint a deputy in each district, who shall: Be a qualified elector of the district; take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101; and, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, give bond to the principal.

In lieu of the bond required by subsection (1) of this section, a county may purchase crime insurance coverage on behalf of a deputy assessor to protect the people of the county from any malfeasance on the part of the deputy assessor while in office.

Source:

G.L.

§ 549.

L. 1879:

p. 40, § 1.

G.S.

§ 648.

R.S. 08:

§ 1343.

C.L.

§ 8818.

CSA:

C. 45, § 165.

CRS 53:

§ 35-8-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-8-2.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 564, § 29, effective August 11.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 698, § 27, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

30-10-803. Office and supplies - expenses.

The county assessor shall keep his or her office at the county courthouse or at a location in the county seat provided by the board of county commissioners, and shall be provided with a suitable room, vault, necessary office furnishings, books, maps, plats, and all forms and blanks required to be used, and other office supplies.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the assessor may keep one or more offices outside of the county seat. Any such office shall be in addition to his or her respective office kept pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and shall be within the same county. Any such additional office may be kept only if the board of county commissioners of such county makes office space or funding available to provide for the office. As used in this section, "office" shall mean a place where some or all of the duties of the assessor are conducted. All necessary expenses shall be audited and paid as other county expenses are audited and paid.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 527, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8819.

CSA:

C. 45, § 166.

CRS 53:

§ 35-8-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-8-3.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 652, § 2, effective May 30.

30-10-804. Assistants - refusal to furnish - appeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 528, § 4.

C.L.

§ 8820.

CSA:

C. 45, § 167.

CRS 53:

§ 35-8-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-8-4.

L. 72:

p. 589, § 51.

L. 77:

Entire section repealed, p. 1739, § 24, effective June 20.

30-10-805. Expenses of assessor. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 13:

p. 529, § 6.

C.L.

§ 8821.

CSA:

C. 45, § 168.

CRS 53:

§ 35-8-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-8-5.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1739, § 23, effective June 20.

L. 88:

Entire section repealed, p. 917, § 4, effective April 14.

Cross references:

For present provisions concerning the payment of actual and necessary expenses of county officers while engaged in business on behalf of the county, see § 30-2-102 (3)(e).